Georgia statutes. TITLE 46 Public Utilities and Public Transportation
PART 16 Provisions Relating to the Secretary of State

46-3-520.
Powers of Secretary of State generally.

The Secretary of State shall have such power and authority as is reasonably necessary to enable him to administer this article efficiently and to perform the duties imposed upon him by this article, including, without limitation, the power and authority to employ from time to time such additional personnel as in his judgment are required for those purposes.

History.

Code 1933, § 34C-1503, enacted by Ga. L. 1981, p. 1587, § 1.

46-3-521.
Propounding of interrogatories by Secretary of State.

The Secretary of State may propound to any electric membership corporation or foreign electric cooperative subject to this article, and to any officer or director thereof, such interrogatories as may be reasonably necessary and proper to enable him to ascertain whether such electric membership corporation or foreign electric cooperative had complied with all of the provisions of this article applicable to such electric membership corporation or foreign electric cooperative. Such interrogatories shall be answered within 30 days after the mailing thereof or within such additional time as shall be fixed by the Secretary of State; and the answers thereto shall be full and complete and shall be made in writing and under oath. If such interrogatories are directed to an individual, they shall be answered by him; and, if directed to an electric membership corporation or foreign electric cooperative, they shall be answered by the president, a vice-president, secretary, an assistant secretary, treasurer, or an assistant treasurer thereof. The Secretary of State need not file any document to which such interrogatories relate until such interrogatories are answered as provided in this Code section and not then if the answers thereto disclose that such document is not in conformity with this article. The Secretary of State shall certify to the Attorney General, for such action as the Attorney General may deem appropriate, all interrogatories and answers thereto which disclose a violation of any of the provisions of this article.

History.

Code 1933, § 34C-1501, enacted by Ga. L. 1981, p. 1587, § 1.

46-3-522.
Disclosure of facts and information obtained from interrogatories.

Interrogatories propounded by the Secretary of State and the answers thereto shall not be open to public inspection, nor shall the Secretary of State disclose any facts or information obtained therefrom except insofar as his official duty may require the same to be made public or in the event such interrogatories or the answers thereto are required for evidence in any criminal proceedings or in any other action by this state.

History.

Code 1933, § 34C-1502, enacted by Ga. L. 1981, p. 1587, § 1.

46-3-523.
Notification of actions taken by Secretary of State; appeal of Secretary of State’s decision to superior court; appeal by foreign electric cooperative whose certificate is revoked; appeal of decision of superior court.

If the Secretary of State refuses to grant a name certificate, revokes the reservation of a corporate name as provided in subsection (e) of Code Section 46-3-221, or refuses to file any articles of incorporation, amendment, merger, consolidation, or dissolution, or any other document required by this article to be filed by the Secretary of State, he shall, within ten days after application for the name certificate is made, or his revocation of a reservation of a corporate name, or the delivery of any of the aforesaid documents to him, give written notice of his action to the person making such application, or having made such reservation of corporate name, or delivering such document, which notice shall specify the date of and the reasons for his action.

Within 40 days from the date of such action by the Secretary of State, such person may appeal to the superior court of the county in which the registered office of the electric membership corporation or foreign electric cooperative affected by such action is, or is proposed to be, situated by filing with the clerk of such court a petition setting forth a copy of such application, or of such reservation, or of the articles or other document sought to be filed, and a copy of the written notice from the Secretary of State of his action; whereupon the matter shall promptly be tried de novo by the court without a jury. The court shall either sustain the action of the Secretary of State or direct him to take such action as the court may deem proper.

If the Secretary of State revokes the certificate of authority to transact business in this state of any foreign electric cooperative, pursuant to Code Sections 46-3-466 and 46-3-467, such foreign electric cooperative may appeal to the superior court of the county where the registered office of such foreign electric cooperative in this state is situated, by filing with the clerk of such court a petition setting forth a copy of its certificate of authority to transact business in this state and a copy of the notice of revocation given by the Secretary of State; whereupon the matter shall be tried de novo by the court without a jury. The court shall either sustain the action of the Secretary of State or direct him to take such action as the court may deem proper.

Appeals from all final orders and judgments entered by the superior court under this Code section in review of any ruling or decision of the Secretary of State may be taken to the Court of Appeals or the Supreme Court in the same manner as in other civil cases.

History.

Code 1933, § 34C-1504, enacted by Ga. L. 1981, p. 1587, § 1.